Utah statutes.
26-8a-413.   License renewals.

(1)  A licensed provider desiring to renew its license shall meet the renewal requirements established by department rule.

(2)  The department shall issue a renewal license for a ground ambulance provider or a paramedic provider upon the licensee's application for a renewal and without a public hearing if there has been:

(a)  no change in controlling interest in the ownership of the licensee as defined in Section 26-8a-415;

(b)  no serious, substantiated public complaints filed with the department against the licensee during the term of the previous license;

(c)  no material or substantial change in the basis upon which the license was originally granted;

(d)  no reasoned objection from the committee or the department; and

(e)  if the applicant was licensed under the provisions of Sections 26-8a-406 through 26-8a-409, no conflicting license application.

(3) (a) (i)  The provisions of this Subsection (3) apply to a provider licensed under the provisions of Sections 26-8a-405.1 and 26-8a-405.2.

(ii)  A provider may renew its license if the provisions of Subsections (1), (2)(a) through (d), and this Subsection (3) are met.

(b) (i)  The department shall issue a renewal license to a provider upon the provider's application for renewal for one additional four-year term if the political subdivision certifies to the department that the provider has met all of the specifications of the original bid.

(ii)  If the political subdivision does not certify to the department that the provider has met all of the specifications of the original bid, the department may not issue a renewal license and the political subdivision shall enter into a public bid process under Sections 26-8a-405.1 and 26-8a-405.2.

(c) (i)  The department shall issue an additional renewal license to a provider who has already been issued a one-time renewal license under the provisions of Subsection (3)(b)(i) if the department and the political subdivision do not receive, prior to the expiration of the provider's license, written notice from an approved applicant informing the political subdivision of the approved applicant's desire to submit a bid for ambulance or paramedic service.

(ii)  If the department and the political subdivision receive the notice in accordance with Subsection (3)(c)(i), the department may not issue a renewal license and the political subdivision shall enter into a public bid process under Sections 26-8a-405.1 and 26-8a-405.2.

(4)  The department shall issue a renewal license for an air ambulance provider upon the licensee's application for renewal and completion of the renewal requirements established by department rule.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

